Florida, session 2026, HB387.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 330.42, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
330.42 Automatic dependent surveillance broadcasts.—
(1) For purposes of this section, the term:
(a) "Aircraft" has the same meaning as in s. 330.27,
except that the aircraft must have a gross weight of 12,499
pounds or less and operate under 14 C.F.R. part 91.
(b) "Automatic dependent surveillance broadcast" means an
advanced aviation surveillance technology that combines an
aircraft's positioning source, aircraft avionics, and a ground
infrastructure to create an accurate surveillance interface
between an aircraft and air traffic control. The term includes
two different services, ADS-B In and ADS-B Out, that can provide
information, such as an aircraft's global positioning system
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb387-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 387 2026
location, altitude, ground speed, and other data, to ground
stations and other aircraft, as well as weather and
traffic information to aircraft operators.
(c) "Touch-and-go landing" means an operation by an
aircraft that lands and departs on a runway without stopping or
exiting the runway.
(2) An airport may not use information broadcast or
collected by automatic dependent surveillance broadcast systems,
regardless of whether that data originates from ADS-B In or ADS-
B Out, as a means for calculating, generating, and collecting
fees from aircraft owners or operators who operate aircraft
within the geographic boundaries of this state under the
following circumstances:
(a) When the operation for which a fee would be assessed
is a departure or landing, including, but not limited to, a
touch-and-go landing.
(b) When the fee would be assessed based on an aircraft
entering into a specified radius of the airspace of the airport
assessing the fee.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb387-01-c1